Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 10. Ownership and Transfer of Property; Creditors.

Sec. 10.50.350.
Ownership of company property.

Property transferred to or otherwise acquired by a limited liability company is the property of the company and is not the property of the members individually.

A limited liability company shall acquire, hold, and convey property, including real property, in the name of the company. If a limited liability company acquires an interest in property, the company holds the title to the interest and not the members individually.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.355.
Transfer of property.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a limited liability company may transfer the property of the company if the company uses an instrument of transfer signed by a member of the company in the name of the company.

If the company is managed by a manager,

title to limited liability company property may be transferred by an instrument of transfer signed by a manager of the company in the name of the company; and

a member, solely by reason of being a member, does not have the authority to transfer the property of the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.360.
Recovery of property.

A limited liability company may recover property transferred under AS

10.50.355

if the company proves that the execution of the instrument of transfer did not bind the company under AS

10.50.250

, unless the property has been transferred by the initial transferee, or by a person claiming through the initial transferee, to a subsequent transferee who gives value without having notice that the person who signed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.370.
Nature of interest in company.

A limited liability company interest is personal property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.375.
Assignment of interest in company.

A person may assign a limited liability company interest in whole or in part.

The assignment of a limited liability company interest entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distributions to which the assignor is entitled.

The assignment of a limited liability company interest does not dissolve the company or entitle the assignee to participate in the management and affairs of the company, to become a member, or to exercise the rights of a member. Unless the assignee of the interest becomes a member with respect to the interest, the assignor continues to be a member and may exercise the rights of a member, subject to the members’ right to remove the assignor under AS

10.50.205

.

Unless the assignee becomes a member, an assignee of a limited liability company interest is not liable as a member solely as a result of the assignment.

The assignor of a limited liability company interest is not released, solely as a result of the assignment, from the assignor’s liability as a member.

An operating agreement may establish terms different from those in (a) — (e) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, the pledge of, or granting of a security interest, lien, or other encumbrance in or against, a part or all of a member’s limited liability company interest is not an assignment under this section and does not terminate the membership or the rights and powers of the member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.380.
Rights of judgment creditors.

If a judgment creditor of a limited liability company member applies to a court of competent jurisdiction, the court may charge the member’s limited liability company interest for payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment.

To the extent a limited liability company interest is charged under (a) of this section, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the member’s interest.

This section provides the exclusive remedy that a judgment creditor of a member or a member’s assignee may use to satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited liability company. Other legal or equitable remedies, including foreclosure on the member’s limited liability company interest and a court order for directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor member might have made, are not available to the judgment creditor attempting to satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited liability company and may not be ordered by a court.

This section does not deprive a member of the benefit of an exemption applicable to the member’s membership interest.

This section applies to limited liability companies with only one member as well as to limited liability companies with more than one member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2000; am §§ 4, 5 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 1, SLA 2000 provides that subsections (c) and (d) of this section, added by sec. 1, ch. 1, SLA 2000, “do not apply to the remedies available to a judgment creditor for collecting a judgment entered by a court before March 8, 2000.”

Sec. 10.50.385.
Rights of estate or legal representative of deceased or incompetent member.

If a member who is an individual dies or if a court of competent jurisdiction determines the member to be incompetent to manage the member’s person or property, the member’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative has the rights of an assignee of the member’s interest, if the member’s interest has not been terminated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.390.
Rights of dissolved or terminated entity.

If a member who is not an individual terminates or is dissolved, the member’s legal representative or successor has the rights of an assignee of the member’s interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)